Massachusetts, session 194th, H1619.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 9 of Chapter 211B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following:- “(xxv) the
responsibility to collect and maintain offense information, race, gender, and age data of persons
before the court accused of a crime, and to provide such data publicly.”
of 1